Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 4

Attendance and Leave

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

21-4-101. Leave of absence for public service.

Any person who is employed by any person, firm, or corporation in the State of Arkansas shall be granted a leave of absence, upon the election of any such employee to a public office in the State of Arkansas, or upon appointment by the Governor of any such person to a board or commission in the State of Arkansas, which office requires the employee's absence from their employment.

The leave of absence shall be for such period as the employee may request, not to exceed the duration of the term of office to which the employee has been elected.

The granting of the leave of absence by the employer shall not be held to impair the employee's seniority rights of the job, nor shall the departmental seniority of the employee be broken for job purposes.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 358, § 1; 1957, No. 242, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2333.

21-4-102. Leave of absence for certain training programs.

(1)All employees of the state, as defined in §21-4-203, or of any of its political subdivisions, who desire to take a leave of absence for the purpose of participating in the military training programs made available by the National Guard or any of the reserve and auxiliary branches of the armed forces and all state employees who are members of the United States Public Health Service Ready Reserve Corps who desire to take a leave of absence for the purpose of participating in the civil defense and public health training programs made available by the United States Public Health Service shall be entitled to such a leave of absence for a period of fifteen (15) days plus necessary travel time for annual training requirements or other duties performed in an official duty status in any one (1) calendar year.

To the extent this leave is not used in a calendar year, it will accumulate for use in the succeeding calendar year until it totals fifteen (15) days at the beginning of the calendar year.

(1)Whenever any employee is granted a leave of absence under the provisions of this section, he or she shall be entitled to his or her regular salary during the time he or she is away from his or her duties during such leave of absence.

The leave of absence shall be in addition to the regular vacation time allowed to the employee.

(1)Employees called to duty in emergency situations by the Governor or by the President of the United States shall be granted leave with pay not to exceed thirty (30) working days, after which leave without pay will be granted. This leave shall be granted in addition to all other leave the employee shall be entitled to.

“Emergency situations” shall have the same meaning as in §21-4-212.

(1)During a leave of absence, the employee shall be entitled to preserve all seniority rights, efficiency or performance ratings, promotional status, retirement privileges, life and disability insurance benefits, and any other rights, privileges, and benefits to which they have become entitled.

The period of military service shall, for purposes of computations to determine whether such person may be entitled to retirement benefits, be deemed continuous service and the employee shall not be required to make contributions to any retirement fund.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 465, § 1; 1957, No. 246, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2332; Acts 1991, No. 673, § 2; 1991, No. 956, § 1; 2017, No. 529, § 1.

21-4-103. Service credit for former Office of Child Support Enforcement contractors.

Any employee of the Office of Child Support Enforcement who was formerly employed by a public contractor with a contract in effect as of January 1, 1998, with the office and who moved from employment with the public contractor to employment with the office without a break in service shall be entitled to credit for service for the time he or she was employed by the contractor for the purpose of establishing eligibility for annual leave accrual and career service awards to the same extent as regular state employees.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 882, § 1.

21-4-104. Leave of absence for emergency and rescue services.

An employee of the state, a city of the first class, a city of the second class, an incorporated town, or a county who is a member of:

The United States Civil Air Patrol or the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary and desires to take a leave of absence for the purpose of participating in a training program for the United States Civil Air Patrol or the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary or in emergency and rescue services shall be entitled to a leave of absence with pay for a period of fifteen (15) days for that purpose during any one (1) calendar year, if the leave of absence is at the request of the employee's wing commander, the wing commander's designated representative, or District 15 Captain; or

The National Disaster Medical System, a Disaster Mortuary Operational Response Team, or a Disaster Medical Assistance Team, of the Office of Emergency Management of the Office of the Assistant Secretary for Preparedness and Response of the Department of Health and Human Services and desires to take a leave of absence for the purpose of participating in a training program in emergency and rescue services shall be entitled to a leave of absence with pay for a period of fifteen (15) days for that purpose during any one (1) calendar year, if the leave of absence is in response to a United States Department of Health and Human Services National Disaster Team Alert Order.

If an employee is granted a leave of absence under this section, the employee shall be entitled to his or her regular salary during the time the employee is away from his or her duties during the leave of absence.

The leave of absence shall be in addition to the regular vacation time allowed to the employee.

During a leave of absence, the employee shall be entitled to preserve:

All seniority rights, efficiency or performance ratings, promotional status, retirement privileges, and life and disability insurance benefits; and

Any other rights, privileges, and benefits to which he or she has become entitled.

For purposes of computations to determine whether the person may be entitled to retirement benefits, the period of the leave of absence shall be deemed continuous service.

The state, city, or county shall continue to contribute its portion of any life or disability insurance premiums during the leave of absence on behalf of the employee, if requested, so that continuous coverage may be maintained.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), inserted the (a)(1) designation and added (a)(2); inserted “the Coast Guard Auxiliary or” in (a)(1) and made stylistic changes.

All seniority rights, efficiency or performance ratings, promotional status, retirement privileges, and life and disability insurance benefits; and

Any other rights, privileges, and benefits to which he or she has become entitled.

“Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program” means the incentive program of the Department of Health that will reward regular exercise, good nutrition, and other healthy lifestyle choices.

Make the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program available to all agency directors; and

Assist the agencies in the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program's implementation.

Upon completion of the pilot program, every agency director shall consider making the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program available to the agency's employees.

(1)At the discretion of the agency director, an employee may be granted paid leave of up to three (3) days per calendar year for satisfactory compliance with the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program.

Each agency shall identify and maintain, if practicable, in or near each agency building an area or areas that employees may use for walking exercise.

(1)A paid firefighter for the state or any political subdivision of the state who has completed five (5) or more years of employment as a paid firefighter shall be granted a minimum of one thousand four hundred fifty-six (1,456) hours of paid leave upon the initiation of treatment for an occupationally caused cancer.

Does not reduce the accrued sick leave or annual vacation leave of the firefighter;

Does not impact any other employment benefit of the firefighter; and

May be transferred from a catastrophic leave bank of a fire department that provides a catastrophic leave program if the catastrophic leave program meets the requirements of this subdivision (a)(2).

A firefighter is considered to have an occupationally caused cancer if the firefighter:

While in the official line of duty, was exposed to a known carcinogen as determined by the Department of Health in consideration with the findings of the International Agency for Research on Cancer; and

Has a disability or an impairment of health as a result of a diagnosis of a cancer listed in § 21-5-705(a)(3)(A)(i).

A firefighter is not entitled to paid leave under subdivision (a)(1) of this section if the firefighter's cancer:

Did not result from the firefighter's employment with the state or political subdivision of the state.

(a)An occupationally caused cancer under this section is presumed to result from a firefighter's employment if at the time of employment the firefighter underwent a physical examination that did not reveal substantial evidence that the occupationally caused cancer existed before his or her employment as a firefighter.

To rebut the presumption under subdivision (a)(4)(A)(ii)(a) of this section, the employer shall prove by a preponderance of the medical evidence that the occupationally caused cancer did not occur as a result of employment in the official line of duty; or

Did result from the firefighter's employment with the state or political subdivision of the state, but workers' compensation is provided for the occupationally caused cancer.

(1)(A)A fire department may participate in a firefighter cancer relief network created and governed by the Arkansas Association of Fire Chiefs, the Arkansas Professional Fire Fighters Association, and the Arkansas State Firefighters Association, Inc.

A firefighter cancer relief network under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall be established by September 1, 2019.

A fire department that participates in a network under subdivision (b)(1) of this section may provide a firefighter to a requesting fire department to relieve a firefighter granted leave under this section and employed by the requesting fire department, if:

The fire department that provided the firefighter continues to pay the firefighter's regular rate of pay and benefits, including without limitation any overtime compensation;

The firefighter provided by the fire department continues to be covered by all applicable laws; and

The fire department that requested the firefighter provides evidence to the fire department that provided the firefighter of substantial adverse budgetary impact without relief as the result of granting paid leave under this section.

Effective Dates. Acts 1977, No. 664, § 3: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and determined by the General Assembly that proper and effective management and control of state finances and personnel management required that the provisions of this Act be implemented at the commencement of the 1977-79 biennium, therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1979, No. 1077, § 5: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to place the institutions of higher learning under the provisions of the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy and to provide that the same rules and regulations that apply to other classified positions shall also apply to these classified positions located in the institutions of higher education. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1981, No. 695, § 5: Mar. 24, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law pertaining to compensatory time under the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act is vague and that this Act is immediately necessary to eliminate confusion. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 931, § 7: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to adopt a Uniform Personnel Classification Plan for State Agencies and to provide that essential changes are implemented for the adequate functioning of those State Agencies. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1991, Nos. 91 and 169, § 7: Feb. 7, 1991 and Feb. 18, 1991, respectively. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the various state agencies should be authorized to establish catastrophic leave bank programs whereby state employees could contribute accrued annual leave and sick leave to the bank so that employees who suffer catastrophic illness could continue to be paid while off work for a length of time in excess of the accrued annual leave and sick leave of the employee; that this Act authorizes the establishment of such programs; and that this Act should be given effect immediately in order to grant the various agencies the power to institute the programs as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 1044, § 21 and No. 1438, § 10: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1999 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1999 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1176, § 8: Apr. 7, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that under the current law relating to the catastrophic leave program for state agency employees and for full-time employees of state institutions of higher education, catastrophic illness is defined as a medical condition of an employee only and does not include medical conditions of members of the employee's immediate family; that many times it is necessary that an employee miss work to care for a seriously ill member of the employee's immediate family; that if the employee has exhausted his or her accrued annual and sick leave and is not permitted to benefit from the catastrophic leave program he or she may suffer a substantial loss of income and serious hardship; that this act is designed to expand the term ‘catastrophic illness’ as used in the law which establishes the catastrophic leave bank program to include catastrophic illness of a spouse or parent of an employee or of a child of the employee which may be claimed as a dependent under the Arkansas Income Tax Act of 1929 and should be given effect immediately to avoid serious hardship to certain employees of state agencies and of state-supported institutions of higher education. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1438, § 10: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1999 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1999 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2003, No. 194, § 3: Feb. 21, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain state employees with severe illnesses are being denied time off to deal with those illnesses; that the employees are in dire need of relief from the strict requirements of the catastrophic leave law; that by denying them the time off an unnecessary hardship has befallen those public employees; and that this act is immediately necessary because of the immediate need for time off for those employees. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 835, § 5: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of this act are needed to comply with the federal guidelines concerning uniform attendance and leave policies; that this act should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year; and that this act is immediately necessary to prevent confusion and uncertainty for state employees. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2007, No. 1028, § 3: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act adds to the provisions of the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act and that the ideal time to implement this change to the state's leave policies is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2017, No. 182, § 6: Feb. 16, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is in the best interest of the state to provide paid maternity leave to state employees; that this act is necessary because it provides a state employee the option to participate in a paid maternity leave program; and that this act is immediately necessary so that current public employees may utilize the paid maternity leave program as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 471, § 1; 2015, No. 1041, § 1.

21-4-105. Leave of absence for reexamination or treatment of service-connected disability.

All employees of the State of Arkansas, as defined in §21-4-203, who have been rated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or its predecessor to have incurred a military service-connected disability and have been scheduled by the department to be reexamined or treated for the disability shall be entitled to a leave of absence with pay for a period not to exceed six (6) days for that purpose during any one (1) calendar year.

(1)If an employee receives a leave of absence under this section, the employee shall be entitled to his or her regular salary during the time the employee is away from his or her duties during the leave of absence.

The leave of absence shall be in addition to the regular annual leave and sick leave allowed to the employee.

During a leave of absence, the employee shall be entitled to preserve:

For purposes of computations to determine whether the employee may be entitled to retirement benefits, the period of the leave of absence shall be deemed continuous service.

The state shall continue to contribute its portion of any life or disability insurance premiums during the leave of absence on behalf of the employee, if requested, so that continuous coverage may be maintained.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 653, § 1.

21-4-106. Leave of absence for participation in Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Agency” means a department, agency, bureau, including the Bureau of Legislative Research, board, or commission of any branch of state government;

“Employee” means a full-time employee of the State of Arkansas or any branch, department, agency, board, bureau, including the Bureau of Legislative Research, or commission of any branch of state government; and

(1)Upon completion of a pilot program to be conducted by the department, the department shall:

The leave shall be used in the calendar year in which it was granted.

The leave is not compensable at termination.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 724, § 1.

21-4-107. Paid leave for firefighters with occupationally caused cancer.

Paid leave for occupationally caused cancer under subdivision (a)(1) of this section:

History.

Acts 2019, No. 973, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act

21-4-201. Title.

This subchapter may be referred to and cited as the “Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act”.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 567, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2365.

21-4-202. Legislative intent.

It is the purpose and intent of this subchapter to establish a uniform attendance and leave policy for all affected state employees of agencies, boards, and commissions covered by the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 567, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2364.

21-4-203. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Agency head” or “agency director” means the executive head of an agency, department, board, commission, bureau, council, or other entity of the state;

“Annual leave” means vacation time with pay but does not include compensatory time;

“Catastrophic illness” means a medical condition, as certified by a physician, of an employee, of the spouse or parent of the employee or of a child of the employee who may be claimed as a dependent under the Income Tax Act of 1929 which requires the employee's absence from duty for a prolonged period of time and which, except for the catastrophic leave program, would result in a substantial loss of income to the employee because of the exhaustion of all earned sick and annual leave;

“Catastrophic leave” means leave granted to an employee as a result of a catastrophic illness, upon the employee's exhausting all sick and annual leave;

“Catastrophic leave bank” means a pool of accrued annual and sick leave donated by employees;

“Compensatory time” means time off in lieu of payment for overtime hours;

“Educational leave” means any period of out-service training during which time the employee pursues a regular full-time course of instruction to acquire a specific skill or skills needed;

“Employee” means a person regularly appointed or employed in a position of state service by a state agency, as defined in subdivision (11) of this section, for which he or she is compensated on a full-time basis;

“Probationary employee” means a person certified from a list of eligibles or employed through a work test appointment and serving a probationary period;

“Provisional employee” means a person who has been appointed to fill a position pending the establishment of a register for such a position;

“State agencies” means all agencies, departments, boards, commissions, bureaus, councils, state-supported institutions of higher education, or other agencies except the following excluded agencies or positions within agencies:

The elected constitutional officers of this state and their employees;

The General Assembly and its employees, including employees of the Bureau of Legislative Research and Arkansas Legislative Audit;

Members of the Supreme Court, members of the Court of Appeals, the Administrative Office of the Courts, circuit courts, and prosecuting attorneys, but not including deputy prosecuting attorneys;

The Arkansas Department of Transportation; and

All administrative, academic, or other nonclassified employees of the state-supported institutions of higher education;

“Temporary employee” means a person who has been appointed from a register for a period of time not to exceed six (6) months;

“Working day” means all regularly prescribed days of employment in which the employee performs those duties for which he or she was hired.

For the purposes of this subchapter, a working day consists of eight (8) hours; and

“Years of service” includes the total number of years of employment with all agencies of Arkansas state government whether such employment is continuous or not.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment by No. 1176, in (4), added “or of the spouse or parent … Tax Act of 1929” and substituted “except for the catastrophic leave program, would result” for “results”; and made stylistic changes.

The 1999 amendment by No. 1438, in (1)(C), inserted “the Administrative Office of the Courts” and substituted “but not including deputy prosecuting attorneys” for “and the Administrative Office of the Courts.”

The 2001 amendment substituted “Arkansas Surpreme Court, members of the Arkansas Court of Appeals, the Administrative” for “Supreme Court, the Administrative” in (1)(C).

The 2013 amendment added the definitions for “Immediate family member,” “Severe illness” and “Shared leave”.

The 2015 amendment added (17)(C) [now (13)(C)].

The 2017 amendment by No. 182 inserted “and sick” in (5); and deleted former (9), (12), and (13) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2017 amendment by No. 254 substituted “an agency, department, board, commission, bureau, council, or other entity” for “all agencies, departments, boards, commissions, bureaus, councils, or other agencies” in (1); substituted “does not” for “shall not” in (2); in (3), deleted “or” following the first occurrence of “employee”, substituted “who” for “that”, deleted “§26-51-101 et seq.” following “1929”, and substituted “the employee's” for “an employee's”; inserted “a” preceding “position” at the end of (10); and substituted “consists” for “shall consist” in (13)(B).

The 2017 amendment by No. 707 substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (14)(D) [now (11)(D)].

History.

Acts 1975, No. 567, § 3; 1979, No. 1077, § 1; 1981, No. 695, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2366; Acts 1991, No. 91, § 1; 1991, No. 169, § 1; 1999, No. 1044, § 6; 1999, No. 1176, § 3; 1999, No. 1438, § 4; 2001, No. 1553, § 33; 2013, No. 997, § 1; 2015, No. 389, § 1; 2017, No. 182, §§
1, 2; 2017, No. 254, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §
67.